Louisiana, session 2026, SB479.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 21-A of Title 42 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 42:1421 through 1424, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 21-A. REMOVAL OF PUBLIC OFFICIALS BY
LEGISLATIVE IMPEACHMENT
§1421. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter:
(1) "Gross misconduct" means the grossly improper or willful and
persistent failure in the performance of an official's duty to follow and apply the
laws of this state or the laws of the United States or to persistently engage in
grossly improper or illegal conduct which brings disrepute to the judicial
system of this state or for a judge to willfully and persistently violate the canons
of the Code of Judicial Conduct.
(2) "Malfeasance while in office" means substantial wrongdoing or
misconduct by a judge in an official capacity that seriously undermines public
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 479 ENROLLED
confidence in the judiciary, including but not limited to any intentional refusal
or other failure to perform any duty required by law, intentionally performing
official duties in an unlawful manner, intentional or willful commission of an
unlawful or wrongful act including the persistent refusal to follow the laws of
this state or the United States, or knowingly permitting any other public officer
or public employee, under his or her authority, to commit malfeasance in office.
§1422. Impeachment; procedure
A.(1) By majority vote of its elected members, the House of
Representatives is free to proceed with any impeachment under its own
constitutional authority at any time notwithstanding these procedures. The
House may adopt rules of impeachment and may act in accordance with those
rules during a session on any resolution of impeachment filed in the House of
Representatives in the same manner as for passing a bill through the House of
Representatives, but notwithstanding any deadline for filing bills or substantive
resolutions.
(2) This Section shall provide an additional method to orderly consider
impeachment.
(3)(a) If the complaint is against a judge, the speaker of the House of
Representatives or president of the Senate may elect to request a confidential
report from the Judiciary Commission to ascertain whether the matter is
already under active investigation or may elect to propose that the legislature
issue a Special Legislative Address for Investigation pursuant to R.S. 42:1423.
(b) If the complaint is against an official for conduct subject to the
jurisdiction of the Board of Ethics, the speaker of the House of Representatives
or president of the Senate may elect to request a confidential report from the
Board of Ethics to ascertain whether the matter is already under active
investigation.
(c) The speaker of the House of Representatives or president of the
Senate may direct that proceedings pursuant to this Section be paused pending
the conclusion of disciplinary proceedings in another body. However, upon
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 479 ENROLLED
written petition of three-fifths of both the House of Representatives and the
Senate, the investigation shall proceed under this Section.
B. Upon request by three-fifths of both the House of Representatives and
Senate, which may be by written ballot, the speaker of the House of
Representatives shall appoint three members of the House of Representatives,
the president of the Senate shall appoint three members of the Senate, and the
speaker of the House of Representatives and president of the Senate shall jointly
appoint one member of the legislature as chair of a joint legislative committee
on an impeachment investigation. The joint committee shall have the power of
subpoena as a committee of the legislature.
C.(1) An impeachment investigation request under this Section may be
filed in writing by three-fifths of both the House of Representatives and the
Senate and shall be based upon a sworn complaint filed by any citizen with the
clerk of the House of Representatives alleging a violation warranting
impeachment under Section 24 of Article X of the Constitution of Louisiana.
(2) The complaint shall contain the name and legal address of the person
filing the complaint, be based on the complainant's personal knowledge, state
detailed facts, specify the actions of the named respondent which form the basis
for the complaint, and identify each specific rule or law alleged by the
complainant to have been violated.
(3) Upon a determination by three-fifths of the appointed members of the
joint committee that the complaint states facts supporting a finding of probable
cause of a violation warranting impeachment, the committee shall proceed with
an investigation. The joint committee may appoint a special master or special
subcommittee to gather and report facts. Following any failure by the joint
committee to determine under this Paragraph that the complaint states facts
supporting a finding of probable cause of a violation warranting impeachment,
the complaint shall be dismissed.
(4) Unless dismissed, the committee shall investigate, give reasonable
notice to the respondent, and grant the respondent an opportunity to be heard.
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 479 ENROLLED
Any special committee or special master's report and recommendation shall be
presented to the chair of the joint committee as soon as practicable after the
close of the investigation. If the report and recommendation conclude that the
facts do not support a finding of a violation warranting impeachment, the
complaint shall be dismissed unless three-fifths of the appointed members of the
joint committee vote to proceed.
(5) If the report and recommendation of the special master or the select
committee conclude that the facts support a finding of a violation warranting
impeachment, the joint committee shall consider the report and
recommendation, may make further inquiry, shall grant the respondent an
opportunity to be heard before it, and shall respond to the report by taking any
of the following actions: (a) dismiss the complaint; (b) issue a reprimand from
the joint committee; or (c) develop its own recommendation to the speaker of
the House of Representatives based on its investigation provided that any
recommendation for impeachment shall be pursuant to Paragraph (6) of this
Subsection.
(6) If the joint committee recommends impeachment by a three-fifths
vote of its appointed members, the speaker of the House of Representatives shall
present the committee's final recommendation along with any findings of the
special master or special committee, to the House for final action.
(7) No member of the joint committee is recused from further
consideration of the impeachment proceedings or a subsequent Senate trial.
D. Any material provided to the House of Representatives or joint
committee in response to a complaint filed under rule that is confidential under
applicable law shall remain confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person
unless impeachment proceedings are recommended.
E. A complaint under this Section must be filed within two years after
the alleged violation. A violation is committed when every element necessary to
establish a violation of the rule has occurred, and time starts to run on the day
after the violation occurred. A continuing violation does not prescribe. The
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 479 ENROLLED
applicable period of limitation is tolled on the day a sworn complaint is filed
with the clerk of the House of Representatives.
F. When the House of Representatives is in recess or not in session, the
speaker of the House of Representatives may appoint a replacement for any
impeachment manager appointed by the House of Representatives if the
manager neglects or cannot perform the duties of a manager or if the manager
resigns. The speaker of the House of Representatives shall be the sole judge of
such matters.
G. The Senate shall determine the time for the trial of any impeachment
and may sit for the trial whether the legislature is in session or not. The
president of the Senate may fix special meetings of the Senate under Section 24
of Article X of the Constitution of Louisiana for this purpose. The president of
the Senate may appoint a special impeachment committee to develop the rules
and procedures for any particular impeachment.
§1423. Special legislative address concerning investigation of a judge
In lieu of bringing impeachment proceedings, the legislature by
concurrent resolution, adopted in accordance with all applicable rules for
passage of a bill, may refer to the Judiciary Commission for investigation any
matter concerning the conduct of a judge that it finds could constitute gross
misconduct or malfeasance.
§1424. Availability of other proceedings
Nothing in this Chapter shall be construed as precluding removal of any
official, including a judge, by impeachment at any time pursuant to Article X,
Section 24 of the Constitution of Louisiana, removal of a judge by the supreme
court pursuant to Article V, Section 25 of the Constitution of Louisiana, or
removal by suit of officials subject to the provisions of Article X, Section 25 of
the Constitution of Louisiana.
Section 2. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Jacob Carter Act".
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 5 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 479 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.